Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 11. Public Safety Communications Commission

§ 9-2-1101.
Commission; created; definitions.

The public safety communications commission is created.

As used in W.S.

9-2-1101

through

9-2-1104

:

“Public safety agency” means any federal, state or political subdivision entity that provides emergency and public safety services, including state agencies employing peace officers enumerated in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi)(C) through (F) and approved for participation by the communications commission, fire management services, correctional services, emergency management, emergency and disaster relief services and if desired, county, municipal and federal law enforcement agencies;

“System” means the wireless communications network providing regional and statewide radio communications capabilities to public safety agencies.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2101; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1986, ch. 64, § 1; 1991, ch. 121, § 1; 2004, ch. 41, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a) substituted “public safety” for “law enforcement”; and rewrote (b), adding the definition for “public safety agency” and rewriting the definition for “system.”

§ 9-2-1102.
Commission; composition; appointment of members; removal; terms; officers; vacancies; meetings.

The commission shall consist of thirteen (13) voting members to be appointed by the governor and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The voting members shall be appointed from each of the following associations and agencies from their membership:

Wyoming police chiefs association;

Wyoming sheriffs association;

Division of criminal investigation, office of the attorney general;

Wyoming game and fish department;

Wyoming department of transportation;

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

Wyoming fire chiefs’ association;

and (x) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

The public at large;

An ambulance and emergency medical services organization;

The Wyoming association of municipalities or another municipal government association;

The Wyoming county commissioners association or another county government association;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

Tribal government or a tribal government association.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 2.

A member of the Wyoming chapter of the association of public safety communications officials or the national emergency number association;

The Wyoming office of homeland security.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 121, § 2.

The commission shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. Vacancies in these offices shall be filled by the commission from its membership. The commission shall meet at least once every three (3) months. Appointments by the governor shall be made within thirty (30) days of expiration of membership terms. Nominee lists shall be furnished within ten (10) days upon expiration of any membership term. Each member shall serve a three (3) year term. A vacancy on the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governor.

The person appointed to the commission pursuant to paragraph (a)(v) of this section shall be the chief technology officer of the Wyoming department of transportation or another employee of the Wyoming department of transportation who oversees information technology or telecommunications systems.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2102; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 121, § 1, 2; 2004, ch. 41, § 1; 2007, ch. 102, § 1; 2017 ch. 17, § 1, § 2, effective February 16, 2017; 2022 ch. 94, § 1, effective March 16, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (a), increasing the number of members from seven to 17, rewriting (a)(v), and adding (a)(vii) through (xvii); in (c) deleted “voting” preceding “member shall serve a three (3) year term,” and deleted “from a list of two (2) names submitted within ten (10) days of the vacancy by the appointing association or agency” from the end; and made related changes.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(xii) substituted “An” for “Wyoming” and substituted “organization” for “association.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “eleven (11)” for “seventeen (17),” and added the second sentence; in (a)(xiii), substituted “The Wyoming association of municipalities or another” for “Municipal government or a,” and substituted “The Wyoming county commissioners association or another” for “County government or a,” and deleted “; and” at the end of (a)(xvi); and added (d).

The second 2017 amendment, rewrote the section by repealing (a)( vi), (a)(vii), (a)(ix), (a)(x), (a)(xv), and (a)(xvii).

Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 16, 2017.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “thirteen (13)” for “eleven (11),” deleted the former second sentence, which read, “The director of the Wyoming department of transportation, or his designee, shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting member of the commission,” deleted “eleven (11)” preceding “voting members” in the last sentence; and added (a)(xviii) and (a)(xix).

Laws 2022, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 16, 2022.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 41, § 3, provides that notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1102(c), appointments to the public safety communications commission are to be made so that the terms of five (5) members of the commission expire on March 1, 2005, six (6) expire on March 1, 2006 and six (6) expire on March 1, 2007. Thereafter, all terms of the commission will be for three (3) years.

§ 9-2-1103.
Commission; compensation of members.

Members of the commission shall receive mileage and per diem provided state employees.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2103; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 121, § 1; 2004, ch. 41, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “Members” for “Voting members” at the beginning of the section.

§ 9-2-1104.
Commission; powers and duties; advisory capacity to promote system development; public meetings; clerical and administrative support.

The commission shall:

Work with the state budget department, the department of enterprise technology services, the department of homeland security and the department of transportation in an advisory capacity to promote the development, improvement and efficiency of public safety communications systems in the state;

Report in writing each year to the governor and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee concerning any problems related to the installation, operation and maintenance of the system and shall make any recommendations it deems appropriate as a part of the report;

Submit a plan for statewide system networking to the department of enterprise technology services for inclusion in the statewide telecommunications plan developed pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2906(g);

In cooperation with participating federal agencies, establish and assess user fees upon any federal law enforcement agency electing to use and participate in the system;

Promulgate necessary rules and regulations governing system operation and participation and upon failure to comply with adopted rules and regulations, may suspend system use and participation by any participating and noncomplying public safety agency or private entity;

Determine the participation of public safety agencies and private entities in the wireless communications network;

On or before May 31 of each odd numbered year, submit to the governor and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee a report covering the period beginning July 1 of the following year and ending June 30 in the fourth succeeding year detailing the expected costs of implementing the statewide system networking plan. The report shall include projections of one-time and recurring costs;

Recommend guidelines and standards for the development, implementation and operation of next generation 911 emergency communications systems and interoperable public safety communications and data systems in the state, including strategies for improving Wyoming’s current 911 system. As part of the recommendations developed under this paragraph, the commission may identify short-term and long-term technological and policy solutions that integrate existing legacy communications infrastructure into an interoperable system and may develop and submit recommendations for legislation or other state action to further develop and support next generation 911 operations in Wyoming;

Promulgate necessary rules and regulations governing next generation 911 system operation and participation.

The commission may hold public meetings throughout the state and may take other appropriate measures to maintain close liaison with regional, county and municipal organizations and agencies involved in the system.

Necessary clerical and administrative support for the commission shall be furnished by the Wyoming department of transportation.

History.

Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2104; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 178, § 2; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 121, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2004, ch. 41, § 1; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2017 ch. 17, § 1, effective February 16, 2017; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 94, § 1, effective March 16, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i) deleted “the state communications consultant established by W.S.

9-2-1105

” preceding “the administrator of the information technology division,” and substituted “public safety” for “law enforcement,” and in (a)(v) substituted “public safety” for “federal, state or local,” and inserted “or private entity” at the end of the paragraph, and added (a)(vi).

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “department of enterprise technology services, the department of homeland security” for “administrator of the information technology division of the department of administration and information” in (a)(i); in (a)(iii), substituted “department of enterprise technology services” for “administrator of the information technology division”, and substituted “W.S. 9-2-2906(g)” for “W.S.

9-2-1026

.1(a); and substituted “W.S. 19-13-104(d)(v)” for “W.S.

9-2-1026

.1(a)(xiii)” in (c).

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a)(i), inserted “the budget division of the department of administration and information”; in (a)(ii), deleted “in October” following “each year,” and inserted “and the joint transportation, highways and military affairs interim committee”; added (a)(vii); and in (c), substituted “the Wyoming department of transportation” for “in accordance with
W.S. 19-13-104(d)(v).”

Laws 2017, ch. 17, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 16, 2017.

The 2021 amendment,

in (a)(i), added “state” preceding “budget,” deleted “division of the” following “budget” and “of administration and information” preceding “the department of enterprise.”

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment

added (a)(viii) and (a)(ix).

Laws 2022, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 16, 2022.

§ 9-2-1105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 41, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1980, ch. 68, § 1, pertained to office of the state law enforcement radio communications consultant.

Laws 2004, ch. 41, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 9-2-1106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 41, § 2.